Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5197YH (2) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2146 Section 1. Section 29A.28, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Where state active duty, national guard duty, federal 3 active duty, or civil air patrol duty is for a period of less 4 than thirty days, a leave of absence under this section shall 5 only be required for those days that the civil employee would 6 normally perform services for the state, subdivision of the 7 state, or a municipality. The provisions of this This section 8 shall also apply applies to a leave of absence by a member 9 of the national disaster medical system of the United States 10 when activated for federal service with the system. If the 11 workday for a civil employee encompasses a continuous period 12 of up to twenty-four consecutive hours, regardless of whether 13 the workday extends into one or two calendar days, the civil 14 employee shall only be required to take a leave of absence for 15 one day for that workday if a leave of absence is required 16 under this paragraph. Each workday, regardless of the number 17 of hours in the workday, for which a civil employee takes a 18 leave of absence under this section shall count as one day for 19 purposes of calculating the thirty days of paid leave provided 20 under this section. 21